Utah statutes.
35A-3-504.   Relationship of civic and state services.

(1) (a)  Services and supports provided by a civic organization under this part are in addition to, and not in lieu of, any service or support provided by the division to a client.

(b)  Receipt of services from a civic organization may not diminish a person’s eligibility for services or supports from the division.

(2)  A person is under no obligation to receive services from a civic organization.

(3)  A civic organization is under no obligation to provide services to a person, except as provided in a contract between the organization and the division pursuant to Section 35A-3-507.



Amended by Chapter 1, 1998 General Session

